Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
5. BANKS

PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§412:5-100 Definition. In this article
the term "bank" means a corporation which has authority to operate as
a bank under this chapter. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next